How are you Donald?

Well thank you, Lester, and thanks to Hofstra for hosting us. The central question in this election is really what kind of country we want to be and what kind of future we will build together. Today is my granddaughter's second birthday so I think about this a lot. First we have to build an economy that works for everyone, not just those at the top. That means we need new jobs, good jobs with rising incomes. I want us to invest in you. I want us to invest in your future. That means jobs in infrastructure and advanced manufacturing, innovation and technology, clean renewable energy and small business because most of the new jobs will come from small business. We also have to make the economy fairer. That starts with raising the national minimum wage and also guarantee, finally, equal pay for women's work. I also want to see more companies to profit sharing. If you help create the profits you should be able to share in them, not just the executives at the top. And I want us to do more to support people who are struggling to balance family and work. I've heard from so many of you about the difficult choices you face and the stresses that you're under. So let's have paid family leave, earned sick days let's be sure we have affordable childcare and debt-free college. How are we going to do it? We’re going to do it by having the wealthy pay their fair share and close the corporate loopholes. Finally, we tonight are on the stage together, Donald Trump and I. Donald, it's good to be with you. We are going to have a debate where we are talking about the important issues facing our country. You have to judge us. Who can shoulder the immense, awesome responsibilities of the presidency? Who can put into action the plans that will make your life better? I hope that I will be able to earn your vote on November eighth.

Well, I think that trade is an important issue, of course. We are five percent of the world’s population - we have to trade with the other ninety five percent. And we need to have smart fair trade deals. We also though you have a tax system that rewards work and not just a financial transactions. And the kind of plan that Donald has put forth would be trickle-down economics all over again. In fact it would be the most extreme version the biggest tax cuts for the top percents of the people in this country than we've ever had. I call it trumped up trickle-down because that's exactly what it would be. That is not how we grow the economy. We just have a different view about what's best for growing the economy. How we make investments that will actually produce jobs and rising incomes. I think we come at it from somewhat different perspectives. I understand that. You know, Donald was very fortunate in his life and that's all to his benefit. He started his business with fourteen million dollars borrowed from his father and he really believes that the more you help wealthy people, the better off we will be and that everything will work out from there. I don't buy that. I have a different experience. My father was a small businessman. He worked really hard, he printed drapery fabrics on long tables where he pulled out those fabrics and he went down with the silkscreen and dumped the paint in and took the squeegee and kept going. And so what I believe is the more we can do for the middle class, the more we can invest in you, your education, your skills, your future, the better we will be off in the better we will grow. That's the kind of economy I wanted to see again.

Well, let’s stop for a second and remember where we were eight years ago, we had the worst financial crisis - the great recession, the worst since the 1930s. That was, in large part, because of tax policies that slash taxes on the wealthy, failed to invest in the middle class, took their eyes off of Wall Street and created a perfect storm. In fact, Donald was one of the people who rooted for the housing crisis. He said, back in 2006, gee, I hope it does collapse because then I can go in and buy some and make some money. Well, it did collapse.

Nine million people, nine million people lost their jobs. Five million people lost their homes. And thirteen trillion dollars in family wealth was wiped out. Now, we have come back from that abyss. And it has not been easy. So we’re now on the precipice of having a potentially much better economy. But the last thing we need to do is to go back to the policies that failed us in the first place. Independent experts have looked at what I’ve proposed and looked at what Donald has proposed. And basically they have said this -- that if his tax plan, which would blow up the debt by over five trillion dollars,

and would, in some instances, disadvantage middle-class families compared to the wealthy, were to go into effect, we would lose three and a half million jobs. And maybe have another recession. They’ve looked at my plans, and they’ve said okay, if we can do this, and I intend to get it done, we will have ten million more new jobs. Because we will be making investments where we can grow the economy. Take clean energy. Some country is going to be the clean energy superpower of the twenty first century. Donald thinks that climate change is a hoax perpetrated by the Chinese. I think it's real.

The science is real. And I think is important that we grip this and deal with it both at home and abroad. And here’s what we can do - we can deploy a half a billion more solar panels. We can have enough clean energy to power every home. We can build a new modern electric grid. That’s a lot of jobs. That’s a lot of new economic activity. So I've tried to be very specific about what we can and should do. And I am determined that we are going to get the economy really moving again. Building on the progress we've made over the last eight years but never going back to what got us in trouble in the first place.

Well actually --

Well, actually, I have thought about this quite a bit.

Well, not quite that long. I think my husband did a pretty good job in the 1990s. I think a lot about what worked and how we can make it work again.

...a balanced budget, and incomes went up for everybody. Manufacturing jobs went up also in the 1990s, if we’re actually going to look at the facts. When I was in the Senate, I had a number of trade deals that came before me. And I held them all the same test. Will they create jobs in America? Will they raise incomes in America? And are they good for our national security? Some of them I voted for. The biggest one, is a multinational one known as CAFTA, I voted against. And because I hold the same standards as I look at all of these trade deals. But let's not assume that trade is the only challenge we have in the economy. I think it is a part of it. And I've said what I'm going to do. I'm going to have a special prosecutor. We’re going to enforce the trade deals we have and we’re going to hold people accountable. When I was Secretary of State, we actually increased American exports globally thirty percent. We increased them to China fifty percent. So I know how to really work to get new jobs and to get exports that help to create more new jobs.

Well, I’ve been a senator, Donald..

And I have been a Secretary of State and I have --

That is your opinion -  

That is just not accurate. I was against it once it was finally negotiated and the terms were laid out. I wrote about in --

You know what --

No.

Well, Donald, I know you live in your own reality, but that is not the facts. The facts are, I did say, I hoped it would be a good deal. But when it was negotiated, which I was not possible for, I concluded it wasn't. I wrote about that -- in my….

...before you even announced.

There are --

There are different views about what’s good for our country, our economy and our leadership in the world. And I think it is important to look at what we need to do to get our economy going again. That’s why I said new jobs, with rising incomes, investments, not in more tax cuts that would add five trillion dollars to the debt.

Oh, I do.

In fact, I’ve written a book about it. It’s called, “Stronger Together.” You can pick it up tomorrow at a bookstore or an airport near you.

It’s because I see this. We need to have strong growth, fair growth, sustained growth. We also have to look at how we help families balance the responsibilities at home and the responsibilities at business. So we have a very robust set of plans. And people who have looked at both of our plans, have concluded that mine would create ten million jobs and yours would lose us three and a half million jobs and explode the --

That can't be left to stand. You know,

I kind of assumed that there would be a lot of these charges and claims.

And so we have taken the home page of my website, hillaryclinton.com, and we’ve turned it into a fact checker. So if you want to see in real time what the facts are, please go and take a look.

DONALD TRUMP	And take a look at mine also and you’ll see..

Because what I have proposed would not add a penny to the debt and your plans with add five trillion dollars to the debt. What I have proposed would cut regulations and streamline them for small businesses. What I have proposed would be paid for by raising taxes on the wealthy because they have made all the gains in the economy. And I think it's time that the wealthy and corporations pay their fair share to support this country.

Well, at least I have a plan to fight ISIS.

No, we’re not.

Well, that's -- go to the please, go to the fact checkers.

I have a feeling that by the end of this evening, I’ll be blamed for everything that’s ever happened.

Why not, yeah why not? Just join the debate by saying more crazy things.

Let’s start the clock again, Lester. We’ve looked at your tax proposals. I don't see changes in the corporate tax rates or the kinds of proposals you are referring to that would cause the repatriation, bringing back of money that is stranded overseas.

I happen to support that in a way that will actually work to our benefit. But when I look at what you have proposed, you have what is called now the Trump loophole because it would so advantage you and the business you do. You’ve proposed

...tax benefit for your bit family. And when you look at what you are proposing it is, as I said, Trumped up, trickle-down. Trickle down it did not work. It got us into the mess we were in 2008-2009. Slashing taxes on the wealthy hasn’t worked and a lot of really smart, wealthy people know that. And they are saying, hey we need to do more to make the contributions we should be making to rebuild the middle class. I don't think top-down works in America. I think building the middle-class, investing in the middle class, making college debt-free so more young people can get their education, helping people refinance their debt from college at a lower rate, those are the kinds of things that will really boost the economy, broad-based, inclusive growth.

is what we need in America not more advantages for people at the very top.

Well, I think you have just seen another example of bait and switch here. For 40 years everyone running for president has released their tax returns. You can go and see nearly I think thirty nine, forty years of our tax returns. But everyone has done it. We know the IRS has made clear there is no prohibition on releasing it when you are under audit. So you gotta ask yourself -- why won't he release his tax returns? And I think there may be a couple of reasons. First, maybe he is not as rich as he says he has. Second, maybe he’s not as charitable as he claims to be. Third, we don't know all of his business dealings but we have been told through investigative reporting that he owes about six hundred and fifty million dollars to Wall Street and foreign banks. Or maybe he does not want the American people, all of you watching tonight, to know that he has paid nothing in federal taxes because the only years that anybody has ever seen for a couple of years where he had to turn them over to state authorities when he was trying to get a casino license. And they showed he did not pay any federal income tax.

If you have paid zero, that means zero for troops, zero for vets, zero for vets, zero for schools or health. And I think probably he is not all that enthusiastic about having the rest of our country see what the real reasons are because it must be something really important, even terrible, that he is trying to hide. In the financial disclosure statements they don't give you tax rate. They don't give you all the details the tax returns would. And it just seems to me that this is something that the American people deserve to see. And I have no reason to believe that he has ever going to release his tax returns because there is something he is hiding. And we will guess -- we'll keep guessing at what it might be that he is hiding. But I think the question is were he ever to get near the White House, what would be those conflicts? Who does he owe money to? Well, he owes you the answers to that. And he should provide them.

I do. You know, I made my mistake using a private e-mail.

And if I had to do it over again I would obviously do it differently. But I'm not going to make any excuses. It was a mistake and I take responsibility for that.

And maybe because you have not paid any federal income tax for a lot of years. And the other thing I think is important --

If your main claim to be president of the United States is your business, then I think we should talk about that. You know your campaign manager said that you built a lot of businesses on the backs of little guys. And indeed I have met a lot of the people who were stiffed by you and your businesses Donald. I've met dishwashers, painters, architects, glass installers, marble installers, drapery installers like my dad was, who you refused to pay when they finished the work that you asked them to do. We have an architect in the audience who designed one of your clubhouses at one of your golf courses. It's a beautiful facility. It immediately was put to use. And you wouldn’t pay what the man needed to be paid when he was charging you.

Do the thousands of people that you have stiffed over the course of the business not deserve some kind of apology from someone who has taken their labor, taken the goods that they produced, and then refused to pay them? I can only say that I am certainly relieved that my late father never did business with you. He provided a good middle-class life for us but the people he worked for, he expected the bargain to be kept on both sides. And when we talk about your business, you’ve taken business bankruptcy six times. There a lot of great business people that have never taken bankruptcy once. You call yourself the king of debt. You talk about leverage. You even went and suggested that you would try to negotiate down the national debt of the United States.

Well, sometimes there is not a direct transfer of skills from business to government. But sometimes what happened in business would be really bad for government. And we need to be very clear about that.

Well, you’re right. Race remains a significant challenge in our country. Unfortunately, race still determines too much, often determines where people live, determines what kind of education in their public schools they can get… And yes it determines, how they are treated in the criminal justice system. We've just seen those two tragic examples in both Tulsa and Charlotte. And we've got to do several things at the same time. We have to restore trust between communities and the police. We have to work to make sure that our police are using the best training, the best techniques, that they’re well prepared to use force only when necessary. Everyone should be respected by the law and everyone should respect the law. Right now that's not the case in a lot of our neighborhoods. So I have, ever since the first day of my campaign, called for criminal justice reform. I've laid out a platform that I think would begin to remedy some of the problems we have in the criminal justice system. But we also have to recognize in addition to the challenges that we face with policing there are so many good brave police officers who equally want reform. So we have to bring communities together in order to begin working on that as a mutual goal. And we've got to get guns out of the hands of people who shouldn't have them. The gun epidemic is a leading cause of death of young African-American men, more than the next nine causes put together. So we have to do two things as I said -- we have to restore trust, we have to work with the police, we have to make sure they respect the communities and the communities respect them and we have to tackle the plague of gun violence which is a big contributor to a lot of the problems that we are seeing today.

Well, I've heard, I've heard Donald Titus at his rallies and it's really unfortunate that he paints such a dire negative picture of black communities in our country…

you know, the vibrancy of the black church, the black businesses that employ so many people, the opportunities that so many families are working to provide for their kids, there is a lot that we should be proud of and we should be supporting and lifting up. But we do always have to make sure we keep people safe. There the right ways of doing it and then there are ways that are ineffective. Stop and risk was found to be unconstitutional. And in part because it was ineffective. It did not do what it needed to do. Now I believe in community policing and in fact violent crime is one half of what it was in 1991; property crime is down 40 percent. We just don't want to see it creep back up.  We've had twenty five years of very good cooperation but there were some problems, some unintended consequences. Too many young African-American and Latino men ended up in jail for nonviolent offenses and it's just a fact that if you are young African-American man and you do the same thing as a young white man, you are more likely to be arrested, charged, convicted and incarcerated. So we've got to address the systemic racism in our criminal justice system. We cannot just say law and order. We have to say, we have to come forward with a plan that is going to divert people from the criminal justice system, deal with mandatory minimum sentences which have put too many people away for too long for doing too little. We need to have more second chance programs. I'm glad that we’re ending private prisons in the federal system. I want to see them ended in the state system.  You shouldn't have a profit motivation to fill prison cells with young Americans. So there are some positive ways we can work on this. And I believe, strongly, that common sense gun safety measures would assist us. Right now, and this is something Donald has supported, along with the gun lobby. Right now, we've got too many military-style weapons on the streets in a lot of places, our police are outgunned. We need comprehensive background checks and we need to keep guns out of the hands of those who will do harm and we finally need to pass a prohibition on anyone who is on the terrorist watch list from being able to buy a gun in our country. If you are too dangerous to fly, you are too dangerous to buy a gun. So there are things we can do and we ought to do it in a bipartisan way.  

Lester, I think implicit bias is a problem for everyone, not just police. I think unfortunately too many of us in our great country jump to conclusions about each other. And therefore I think we need all of us to be asking hard questions about, you know, why am I feeling this way?   But when it comes to policing, since it can have literally fatal consequences, I have said in my first budget we would put money into that budget to help us deal with implicit bias by re- training a lot of our police officers. I've met with a group of very distinguished, experienced police chiefs a few weeks ago. They admit it's an issue. They’ve got a lot of concerns. Mental health is one of the biggest concerns because now police are having to handle a lot of really difficult mental health problems on the street. They want support, they want more training, they want more assistance. And I think the federal government could be in a position where we would offer and provide that.

DONALD TRUMP	I'd like to respond.

Well, it's also fair to say, if we’re going to talk about mayors that under the current mayor crime has continued to drop, including murders. So there is-

No,  I'm not.

New York has done an excellent job. And I give credit, I give credit across the board going back to mayors to police chiefs because it has worked. And other communities need to come together to do what will work as well. Look one murder is too many.

But it is important that we learn about what has been effective and not go to things that sound good that really did not have the kind of impact that we would want. Who disagrees with keeping neighborhoods safe? But let's also add no one should disagree about respecting the rights of young men who live in those neighborhoods. And so we need to do a better job of working again with the communities, faith communities, business communities, as well as the police to try to deal with this problem.

I think Donald just criticized me for preparing for this debate. And yes I did. And you know what else I prepared for? I prepared to be president, and I think that's a good thing.

Well, just listen to what you heard.

And, clearly, as Donald just admitted, he knew he was gonna stand on this debate stage and Lester Holt was going to be asking us questions. So he tried to put the whole racist birther lie to bed. But it can't be dismissed that easily. He has really started his political activity based on this racist lie that our first black president was not an American citizen. There was absolutely no evidence for it, but he persisted. He persisted year after year because some of his supporters, people that he was trying to bring into his fold apparently believed it or wanted to believe it. But remember, Donald started his career back in 1973 being sued by the Justice Department for racial discrimination. Because he would not rent apartments in one of his developments to African-Americans. And he made sure that the people who worked for him understood that was the policy. He actually was sued twice by the Justice Department. So he has a long record of engaging in racist behavior. And the birther lie was a very hurtful one. You know, Barack Obama is a man of great dignity, and I could tell how much it bothered him and annoyed him that this was being touted and used against him.  But I like to remember what Michelle Obama said in her amazing speech at our Democratic National Convention. When they go low, we go high. And Barack Obama went high despite Donald Trump’s best efforts to bring him down.

 Now as far as the lawsuit, yes, when I was very young, I went to my father's company. Had a real estate company in Brooklyn and Queens. And we, along with many, many other companies throughout the country, a federal lawsuit, were sued. We settled the suit with zero -- with no admission of guilt. It was very easy to do. But they sued many people. I notice you bring that up a lot, and, you know, I also noticed the very nasty commercials that you do on me in so many different ways, which I don’t do on you. Maybe I’m trying to save the money. But frankly, I look at that, and I say -- isn’t that amazing? Because I settled that lawsuit with no admission of guilt. But that was a lawsuit brought against many real estate firms. And it’s just one of those things. I'll go on one step further. In Palm Beach, Florida -- tough community -- a brilliant community, a wealthy community, probably the wealthiest community there is in the world, I opened a club. And really got great credit for it. No discrimination against African-Americans, against Muslims, against anybody. And it's a tremendously successful club. And I'm so glad I did it. And I have been given great credit for what I did. And I'm very, very proud of it. And that's the way I feel. That is the true way I feel.

Well, I think cyber security, cyber warfare, will be one of the biggest challenges facing the next president because clearly, we're facing, at this point, two different kinds of adversaries. There are the independent hacking groups that do it mostly for commercial reasons to try to steal information that they then can use to make money. But increasingly, we are seeing cyber attacks coming from states, organs of states. The most recent and troubling of these has been Russia. There is no doubt now that Russia has used cyber attacks against all kinds of organizations in our country. And I am deeply concerned about this. I know Donald’s very praise-worthy of Vladimir Putin, but Putin is playing a really tough, long game here. And one of the things he's done is to let loose cyber attackers to hack into government files, to hack into personal files, hack into the Democratic National Committee. And we recently have learned that, you know, that this is one of their preferred methods of trying to wreak havoc and collect information. We need to make it very clear, whether it’s Russia, China, Iran or anybody else, the United States has much greater capacity. And we are not going to sit idly by and permit state actors to go after our information. Our private-sector information or our public-sector information. And were going to have to make it clear that we don't want to use the kinds of tools that we have. We don't want to engage in a different kind of warfare, but we will defend the citizens of this country And the Russians need to understand that. I think they've been treating it as almost a probing. How far would we go? How much would we do? And that's why I was so -- I was so shocked when Donald publicly invited Putin to hack into Americans. That is just unacceptable. It’s one of the reasons why 50 national security officials who served in Republican information -- administrations --

. have said that Donald had is unfit to be the commander in chief. It’s comments like that that really worry people who understand the threats that we face.

Well, I think there are number of issues that we should be addressing. I have put forth a plan to defeat ISIS. It does involve going after them online. I think we need to do much more with our tech companies to prevent ISIS and their operatives from being able to use the Internet to radicalize, even direct, people in our country, in Europe, and elsewhere. But we also have to intensify our airstrikes against ISIS and eventually support our Arab and Kurdish partners to be able to actually take out ISIS in Rocca and in their claim of being a caliphate. We’re making progress. Our military is assisting in Iraq, and we’re hoping that within the year, will be able to push ISIS out of Iraq, and then, you know, really squeeze them in Syria. But we have to be cognizant of the fact that they've had foreign fighters coming to volunteer for them, foreign money, foreign weapons. So we have to make this the top priority, and I would also do everything possible to take out their leadership. I was involved in a number of efforts to take out Al Qaeda leadership when I was secretary of state, including of course, taking out bin Laden. And I think we need to go after Baghdadi as well, make that one of our organizing principles because we’ve got to defeat ISIS. And we’ve got to do everything we can to disrupt their propaganda efforts online.

Well, I hope the fact checkers are turning up the volume and really working hard. Donald supported the invasion of Iraq.

That is absolutely proved over and over again.

He actually advocated for their actions we took in Libya and urged that Gaddafi be taken out after actually doing some business with him one time. But the larger point, he says this constantly, is George W. Bush made the agreement about when American troops would leave Iraq, not Barack Obama. And the only way that American troops could have stayed in Iraq is to get an agreement from the then Iraqi government that would have protected our troops. And the Iraqi government would not give that. But let's talk about the question you asked, Lester. The question you asked is what do we do here in the United States? That’s the most important part of this. How do we prevent attacks? How do we protect our people? And I think we have got to have an intelligence surge where we are looking for every scrap of information. I was so proud of law enforcement in New York, in Minnesota, in New Jersey. They responded so quickly, so professionally to the attacks that occurred by Rahami. And they brought him down. And we may find out more information because he is still alive which may prove to be an intelligence benefit. So we’ve got to do everything we can to vacuum up intelligence from Europe, from the Middle East. That means we've got to work more closely with our allies. And that’s something that Donald has been very dismissive of. Working with NATO, the longest military alliance in the history of the world, to really turn our attention to terrorism. We’re working with our friends in the Middle East, many of which, as you know, are Muslim majority nations. Donald has consistently insulted Muslims abroad, Muslims at home, when we need to be cooperating with Muslim nations and with the American Muslim community. They’re on the frontlines. They can provide information to us that we might not get anywhere else. They need to have close working cooperation with law enforcement in these communities, not be alienated and pushed away as some of Donald’s rhetoric unfortunately has led to.

Okay.

Let's talk about two important issues that were briefly mentioned by Donald. First NATO. You know, NATO as a military alliance has something called Article Five and basically says this -- an attack on one is an attack on all. And do you know, the only time it’s ever been invoked - after 9/11 when the twenty eight nations of NATO said that they would go to Afghanistan with us to fight terrorism. Something that they still are doing by our side. With respect to Iran, when I became Secretary of State, Iran was weeks away from having enough nuclear material to form a bomb. They had mastered the nuclear fuel cycle under the Bush administration. They had built covert facilities. They had stocked them with centrifuges that were whirling away And we had sanctioned them. I voted for every sanction against Iran when I was in the Senate. But it wasn’t enough. So I spent a year and a half putting together a coalition that included Russia and China to impose the toughest sanctions on Iran. And we did drive them to the negotiating table. And my successor John Kerry and President Obama got a deal that put a lid on Iran's nuclear program. Without firing a single shot. That’s diplomacy. That’s coalition-building.  That’s working with other nations. The other day I saw Donald saying that there were some Iranian sailors on his ship in the waters off of Iran and they were taunting American sailors who were on a nearby ship. He said, you know if they taunted our sailors I would blow them out of the water and start another war.

That is not the judgment. That is not the right temperament to be commander-in-chief to be taunted and the worst part

...has been about nuclear weapons. He has said repeatedly that he didn’t care if other nations got nuclear weapons - Japan, South Korea, even Saudi Arabia. It has been the policy of the United States, Democrats and Republicans, to do everything we could to reduce the proliferation of nuclear weapons. He even said, you know if there were nuclear war in East Asia well, you know, that’s fine, have a good time folks.

That in fact his cavalier attitude about nuclear weapons is so deeply troubling, that is the number one threat we face in the world and it becomes particularly threatening if terrorists ever get their hands on any nuclear material. So a man who can be provoked by a tweet shouldn't have his fingers anywhere near the nuclear codes as far as I think anyone with any sense about this should be concerned.

It’s a good one though. It well describes the problems.

Let me start by saying words matter, words matter when you run for president and they really matter when you are president. And I want to reassure our allies in Japan and South Korea and elsewhere that we have mutual defense treaties and we will honor them. It is essential that America's word be good. And so I know that this campaign has caused some questioning and some worries on the part of many leaders across the globe. I’ve talked with a number of them. But I want to, on behalf of myself and I think on behalf of a majority of the American people, say that you know, our word is good. It's also important that we look at the entire global situation. There’s no doubt that we have other problems with Iran but personally I'd rather deal with the other problems having put that lid on their nuclear program than still to be facing that. And Donald never tells you what he would do. What he have started a war? Would he have bombed Iran? If he's going to criticize a deal that has been very successful in giving us access to Iranian facilities that we never had before, then he should tell us what his alternative would be. But it's like his plan to defeat ISIS -- he says it's a secret plan but the only secret is that he has no plan. So we need to be more precise in how we talk about these issues. People around the world follow our presidential campaigns so closely trying to get hints about what we will do. Can they rely on us? Are we going to lead the world with strength and in accordance with our values? That's what I intend to do. I intend to be a leader of our country that people can count on both here at home and around the world. To make decisions that will further peace and prosperity. But also stand up to bullies whether they are abroad or at home. We cannot let those who would try to destabilize the world to interfere with American interests and security.

to be given any opportunities at all.

Well, as soon as he travels to one hundred and twelve countries and negotiates a peace deal, a cease-fire, a release of dissidents, and opening of new opportunities and nations around the world or even spends 11 hours testifying in front of a congressional committee, he can talk to me about stamina. 

Well, one thing Lester, is you know, he tried to switch from looks to stamina but this is a man who is called women pigs, slobs, and dogs, and someone who has said pregnancy is an inconvenience to employers

who has said women don't deserve equal pay unless they do as good a job as men and one of the worst things he said was about a woman in a beauty contest, he loves beauty contests, supporting them and hanging around them. And he called this woman Miss Piggy. Then he called her Miss Housekeeping because she was Latina. Donald she has a name.

Her name is Alicia Machado and she has become a U.S. citizen and you can bet she's going to vote this November.

Well, I support our democracy. And sometimes you and sometimes you lose, but I certainly will support the outcome of this election. And I know Donald trying very hard to plant doubts about it but I hope the people out there understand this election’s really up to you. It's not about us so much is it about you and your families and the kinds of country and future you want. So I sure hope you will get out and vote as though your future depended on it because I think it does.

---

Well thank you, are you a teacher? Yes, I think that that's a very good question because I've heard from lots of teachers and parents about some of their concerns, about some of the things that are being said and done in this campaign.

And I think it is very important for us to make clear to our children that our country really is great because we are good. And we are going to respect one another, lift each other up. We are going to be looking for ways to celebrate our diversity. And we are going to try to reach out to every boy and girl as well as every adult to bring them in to working on behalf of our country. I have a very positive and optimistic view about what we can do together. That's why the slogan of my campaign is stronger together. 

Because I think if we work together, if we overcome the divisiveness that sometimes sets Americans against one another, and instead we make some big goals and I've set forth some big goals - getting the economy to work for everyone, not just those at the top, making sure that we have the best education system from preschool through college and making it affordable and so much else, if we set those goals and we go together to try to achieve them there's nothing, in my opinion, that America can't do.

So that's why I hope that we will come together in this campaign. Obviously, I'm hoping to earn your vote, I'm hoping to be elected in November, and I can promise you I will work with every American. I want to be the president for all Americans. Regardless of your political beliefs, where you come from, what you look like, your religion -- I want us to heal our country and bring it together. Because that's, I think, the best way for us to get the future that are children and our grandchildren deserve.

Well, like everyone else I spent a lot of time thinking over the last forty eight hours about what we heard and saw. You know, with prior Republican nominees for president, I disagreed with them -- on politics, policies, and principles, but I never questioned their fitness to serve. Donald Trump is different. I said starting back in June, that he was not fit to be president and commander-in-chief. 

And many Republicans and independents have said the same thing. What we all saw and heard on Friday was Donald talking about women. What he thinks about women, what he does to women, and he has said that the video doesn't represent who he is. But I think it's clear to anyone who heard it that it represents exactly who he is. Because we've seen this throughout the campaign. We have seen him insult women. We've seen him rate women on their appearance, ranking them from one to ten. We've seen him embarrass woman on TV and on Twitter. We saw him after the first debate spend nearly a week denigrating a former Miss Universe in the harshest, most personal terms.

So, yes, this is who Donald Trump is. But it's not only women and it’s not only this video that raises questions about his fitness to be our president. Because he has also targeted immigrants, African Americans, Latinos, people with disabilities, POWs, Muslims, and so many others. So this is who Donald Trump is and the question for us, the question our country must answer, is that this is not who we are. That's why, to go back to your question, I want to send a message -- we all should -- to every boy and girl and indeed to the entire world, that America already is great, but we are great because we are good. And we will respect one another and we will work with one another and we will celebrate our diversity. These are very important values to me because this is the America that I know and love. And I can pledge to you tonight that this is the America that I will serve if I'm so fortunate enough to become your president.

Well, first, let me start by saying that so much of what he just said is not right. But he gets to run his campaign any way he chooses. He gets to decide what you want to talk about. Instead of answering people’s questions, talking about our agenda, laying out the plans that we have that we think can make a better life and a better country. That's his choice. When I hear something like that, I am reminded of what my friend Michelle Obama advised us all. When they go low, you go high.

And look, if this were just about one video, maybe what he's saying tonight would be understandable. But everyone can draw their own conclusions at this point about whether or not the man in the video or the man on the stage respects women. But he never apologizes for anything to anyone. He never apologized to Mr. and Mrs. Khan, the Gold Star family, whose son Captain Khan, died in the line of duty in Iraq. And Donald insulted and attacked them for weeks over their religion.

He never apologized to the distinguished federal judge who was born in Indiana, but Donald said he couldn't be trusted to be a judge because his parents were quote “Mexican.” He never apologized to the reporter that he mimicked and mocked on national television and our children were watching. And he never apologized for the racist lie that President Obama was not born in the United States of America. He owes the president an apology. He owes our country an apology, and he needs to take responsibility for his actions and his words.

Everything he just said is absolutely false, but I’m not surprised. In the first debate -

I told people that will be impossible to be fact checking Donald all the time. I'd never get talk about anything I want to do and how we’re going to really make lives better for people. So once again, go to HillaryClinton.com. We have literally Trump. You can fact check him in real-time. Last time, this debate, we had millions of people fact checking. So I expect we'll have millions more fact checking because, you know, it is -- it’s just awfully good that someone with the temperament of Donald Trump is not in charge of the law in our country.

Well Martha, first let me say. I’ve said it before but I’ll repeat it because I want everyone to hear it. That was a mistake, I take responsibility for using a personal email account. Obviously, if I were to do it over again, I would not. I'm not making any excuses. It was a mistake, and I am very sorry about that.

But I think it's also important to point out where there are some misleading accusations from critics and others. After a year-long investigation, there is no evidence that anyone hacked the server I was using. And there is no evidence that anyone can point to at all. Anyone who says otherwise has no basis that any classified material ended up in the wrong hands.

I take classified materials very seriously and always have. When I was on the Senate armed service committee, I was privy to lots of classified material. Obviously as Secretary of State, I had some of the most important secrets that we possess, such as going after bin Laden. So I am very committed to taking classified information seriously. And, as I said, there is no evidence that any classified information ended up in the wrong hands.

Look, it's just not true. And so please go to -

Personal e-mails, not official. Well, we turned over thirty five thousand so -

Yes, that's true I didn't.

I didn’t in the first debate. And I'm going to try not to in this debate because I would like to get to the questions that the people have brought here tonight to talk to us about.

Okay Donald, I know you are into big diversion tonight, anything to avoid talking about your campaign and the way it is exploding. And the way Republicans are leaving you. But let's at least focus on some of the issues that people care about tonight. Let's get to their questions.

He wants to start, he can start. No go-ahead, Donald.

Well, I think Donald was about to say he's going to solve it by repealing it. And getting rid of the Affordable Care Act. And I'm going to fix it because I agree with you. Premiums have gotten too high, co-pays, deductibles, prescription drug costs. And I have laid out a series of actions that we can take to try and get those costs down. But here’s what I don't want people to forget when we’re talking about reigning in the costs, which has to be the highest priority of the next president. When the Affordable Care Act passed, it wasn't just that twenty million people got insurance that did not have it before. But that in and of itself was a good thing. I meet these people all the time and they tell me what a difference having the insurance meant to them and their families. But everybody else, the one hundred and seventy million of us, who get health insurance through our employers, got big benefits. Number one, insurance companies can’t deny you coverage because of a pre-existing condition. Number two, no lifetime limits, which is a big deal if you have serious health problems. Number three, women cannot be charged more than men for our health insurance, which is the way it used to be before the Affordable Care Act. Number four, if you are under 26 and your parents have a policy, you can be on that policy until the age of 26.

Something that didn’t happen before. So I want to very much to save what works and what is good about the Affordable Care act. But we have got to get costs down, we have to provide some additional help to small businesses so that they can afford to provide health insurance. But if we repeal it, as Donald has proposed, and start over again. All of those benefits I just mentioned are lost to everybody. Not just people who get their health insurance on the exchange, and then we would have to start all over again. Right now, we are at ninety percent health insurance coverage. That is the highest we have ever been in our country.

So I want to ask to get to an hundred percent but get costs down and keep quality up.

No, I mean he clarified what he meant. And it's very clear. I mean look, we are in a situation in our country where if we were to start all over again, we might come up with a different system. But we have an employer-based system. That's where the vast majority of people get their healthcare. And the Affordable Care Act was meant to try to fill the gap between people who were too poor, and couldn't put together any resources to afford health care, namely people on Medicaid, obviously Medicare, which is a single-payer system, which takes care of our elderly and does a great great job doing it, by the way. And then all the people who were employed and people who were working but didn't have the money to afford insurance and didn't have anybody, an employer or anybody else, to help them. That was the slot that the Obamacare approach was to take.

And like I say, 20 million people now have health insurance.

So if we just rip it up and throw it away, what Donald is not telling you is, we just turn it back to the insurance companies the way it used to be. And that means the insurance companies get to do pretty much whatever they want, including saying, look, I’m sorry you got diabetes, you had cancer, your child has asthma, you may not be able to have insurance because you can’t afford it. So let's fix what is broken about it, but let's not throw it away. And give it all back to the insurance companies.

Well thank you for asking your question and I have heard this question from a lot of Muslim Americans across our country. Because unfortunately there has been a lot of very divisive, dark things said about Muslims and even someone like Captain Khan, the young man who sacrificed himself defending our country in the United States Army has been subject to attack by Donald.

I want to say just a couple of things. First we’ve had Muslims in America since George Washington. 

And we’ve had many successful Muslims. We just lost a particularly well-known one with Muhammad Ali. My vision of America is an America where everyone has a place if you're willing to work hard, you do your part, you contribute to the community -- that's what America is, that's what we want America to be for children and our grandchildren.

It’s also very shortsighted and even dangerous to be engaging in the kind of demagogic rhetoric that Donald has about Muslims. We need American Muslims to be part of our eyes and ears on our front lines. I've worked with a lot of different Muslim groups around America. I've met with a lot of them and I've heard how important it is for them to feel that they are wanted and included and part of our country, part of our homeland security, and that's what I want to see. It's also important - I intend and tend to defeat ISIS to do so in a coalition with majority Muslim nations. Right now a lot of those nations are hearing what Donald says and wondering, “Why should we cooperate with the Americans?” and this is a gift to ISIS and the terrorists. Violent jihadist terrorists. We are not at war with Islam and it is a mistake and it plays into the hands of the terrorists to act as though we are. So I want a country where citizens like you and your family are just as welcome as anyone else.

Well, first of all I will not let anyone into our country that I think poses a risk to us. But there are a lot of refugees - women and children - think of that picture we also that four-year-old boy with the blood on his forehead because he'd been bombed by the Russian and Syrian air forces. There are children suffering in this catastrophic war, largely I believe, because of Russian aggression. And we need to do our part. We by no means are carrying anywhere near the load that Europe and others are.

But we will have vetting that is as tough as it needs to be from our professionals, our intelligence experts, and others. But it is important for us as a policy not to say, as Donald has said, we’re going to ban people based on a religion. How do you do that? We are country founded on religious freedom and liberty. How do we do what he has advocated without causing great distress within our own country? Are we going to have religious tests when people fly into our country? And how do we expect to be able to implement those? So I thought that what he said was extremely unwise and even dangerous and indeed you can look at the propaganda on a lot of the terrorist sites and what Donald Trump says about Muslims is used to recruit fighters because they want to create a war between us. And the final thing I will say this is the tenth or twelfth time that he has denied being for the war in Iraq. We have it on tape. The entire press corps has looked at it. It's been debunked but it never stops him from saying whatever he wants to say.

So please. Go to HillaryClinton.com and you can see it.

Well, as I recall, that was something I said about Abraham Lincoln after having seen the wonderful Steven Spielberg movie called Lincoln. It was a master class watching President Lincoln get the Congress to approve the 13th amendment. It was principled and it was strategic.

And I was making the point that it is hard sometimes to get the Congress to do what you want to do and you have to keep working at it and yes, President Lincoln was trying to convince some people, he used some arguments, convincing other people, he used other arguments. That was a great -- I thought a great display of presidential leadership.

But you know, let's talk about what's really going on here Martha, because our intelligence community just came out and said in the last few days that the Kremlin, meaning Putin and the Russian government, are directing the attacks, the hacking on American accounts, to influence our election. And WikiLeaks is part of that as our other sites, where the Russians hack information, we don't even know it's accurate information, and then they put it out.

We have never in the history of our country been in a situation where an adversary, a foreign power, is working so hard to influence the outcome of the election, and believe me, they’re not doing it to get me elected. They're doing it to try to influence the election for Donald Trump.

Now maybe because he has praised Putin, maybe because he says he agrees with a lot of what Putin wants to do, maybe because he wants to do business in Moscow -- I don't know the reasons that we deserve answers. And we should demand that Trump release all of his tax returns so that people can see what are the entanglements and the financial relationships --

Well, everything you've heard just now from Donald is not true. I'm sorry I have to keep saying this, but he lives in an alternative reality. And it is sort of amusing to hear somebody who hasn't paid federal income taxes in maybe 20 years talk about what he's going to do.

But I’ll tell you what he's going to do. His plan will give the wealthy and corporations the biggest tax cuts they've ever had. More than the Bush tax cuts by at least a factor of two. Donald always takes cares of Donald and people like Donald. And this would be a massive gift.

And indeed, the way that he talks about his tax cuts would end up raising taxes on middle-class families, millions of middle-class families. Now here's what I want to do. I have said nobody who makes less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars a year -- and that is the vast majority of Americans, as you know, will have their taxes raised because I think we have got to go with the money is. And the money is with people who have taken advantage of every single break in the tax code. And yes, when I was a senator, I did vote to close corporate loopholes.

I voted to close, I think, one of the loopholes he took advantage of what he claimed a billion dollar loss that enabled him to avoid paying taxes. I want to have a tax on people who are making a million dollars. It’s called the Buffett rule -- yes, Warren Buffett is the one who has gone out and said somebody like him did not repent a lower tax rate than his secretary. I want to have a surcharge on incomes above five million. We have to make up for lost time because I want to invest in you. I want to invest in hard-working families, and I think it's been unfortunate. But it’s happened that since the great recession, the gains have all gone to the top. And we need to reverse that. People like Donald who paid zero in taxes, zero for our vets, zero for our military, zero for health and education -- that is wrong. And we’re going to make sure that nobody -- no corporation and no individual -- can get away without paying his fare share to support our country.

Well, here we go again. I’ve been in favor of getting rid of carried interest for years. Starting when I was a senator from New York. But that’s not the point here.

Because I was senator with a Republican president. I'll will be the president who will get it done.

You know, under our Constitution, presidents have something called veto power. Look, he has now said repeatedly, thirty years this and thirty years that. So let me talk about my thirty years in public service. I'm very glad to do so.

Eight million kids every year have health insurance because when I was first lady, I worked with Democrats and Republicans to create the children's health insurance program. Hundreds of thousands of kids now have a chance to be adopted because I worked to change our adoption and foster care system. After 9/11, I went to work with a Republican mayor, governor and president to rebuild New York and to get healthcare for our first responders who were suffering because they had a run toward danger and gotten sickened by it. Hundreds of thousands of National Guard and reserve members have healthcare because of work that I did. And children have safer medicines because I was able to pass a law that required the dosing to be more carefully done.

When I was secretary of state, I went around the world, advocating for our country but also advocating for women's rights, to make sure that women had a decent chance to have a better life, and negotiated a treaty with Russia to lower nuclear weapons.

Four hundred pieces of legislation have my name on it, as a sponsor or cosponsor when I was a senator for eight years. I worked very hard and was very proud to be reelected in New York by an even bigger margin than I had been elected the first time. And as president, I will take that work, that bipartisan work, that finding common ground, because you have to be able to get along with people to get things done in Washington.

And I have proven that I can. And for thirty years, I’ve produced results for people.

Well, the situation in Syria is catastrophic. And every day that goes by, we see the results of the regime by Assad in partnership with the Iranians on the ground, the Russians in the air, bombarding places, in particular Aleppo, where there are hundreds of thousands of people, probably about 250,000 still left. And there is a determined effort by the Russian Air Force to destroy Aleppo in order to eliminate the last of the Syrian rebels who are really holding out against the Assad regime. Russia hasn't paid any attention to ISIS. They’re interested in keeping Assad in power. So I, when I was Secretary of State, advocated. And I advocate today a no-fly zone in safe zones.

We need some leverage with the Russians because they're not going to come to the negotiating table for a diplomatic resolution unless there is some leverage over them. And we have to work more closely with our partners and allies on the ground. But I want to emphasize that what is at stake here is the ambitions and the aggressiveness of Russia.

Russia has decided that it's all in in Syria. And they also decided who they want to see become president of the United States, too. And it's not me. I've stood up to Russia. I've taken on pollutant and others. And I would do that as president. I think wherever we can cooperate with Russia, that's fine. And I did at Secretary of State, that’s how we got a treaty reducing nuclear weapons. It’s how we got the sanctions on Iran that put a lid on the Iranian nuclear program without firing a single shot. So I would go to the negotiating table with more leverage that we have now. But I do support the effort to investigate for crimes -- war crimes committed by the Syrians and the Russians and try to hold them accountable.

No, I wasn’t. I was gone. I hate to interrupt you but at some point, we need to do some fact checking.

I would not use American ground forces in Syria. I think that would be a very serious mistake. I don't think American troops should be holding territory, which is what they would have to do as an occupying force. I don't think that is a smart strategy. I do think the use of special forces, which we're using, the use of enablers and trainers in Iraq, which has had some positive effects, are very much in our interest. And so I do support what is happening. But let me --

Well, Martha, I hope that by the time I -- hope by the time I am president that we will have pushed ISIS out of Iraq. I do think that there is a good chance that we can take Mosul. And you know Donald says he knows more about ISIS than the generals. No, he doesn't.

There are a lot of very important planning going on. And some of it is to signal to the Sunnis in the area, as well as Kurdish fighters that we all need to be in this. And that takes a lot of planning and preparation. I would go after Baghdadi. I would specifically target Baghdadi because I think our targeting of Al Qaeda leaders, I was involved in a lot of those operations, highly classified ones, made a difference. So I think that could help.

I would also consider arming the Kurds. The Kurds have been our best partners in Syria, as well as Iraq. And I know there is a lot of concern about that in some circles, but I think that they should have the equipment they need so that the needs of Kurdish and Arab fighters on the ground are the principal way that we take Rocco after pushing ISIS out of Iraq.

Well, 67% of the people voted to reelect me when I ran for my second term. And I was very proud and very humbled by that. Mr. Carter, I have tried my entire life, to do what I can to support children and families. You know, right out of law school I went to work for the Children's Defense Fund. And Donald talks a lot about, you know, the thirty years I've been in public service. I am proud of that. You know, I started off as a young lawyer working against discrimination against African-American children in schools and in the criminal justice system. I worked to make sure that kids with disabilities could get a public education. Something that I care very much about. I have worked with Latinos, one of my first jobs in politics was down in South Texas registering Latino citizens to be able to vote.

So I have a deep devotion to use your absolutely correct word. To making sure that every American feels like he or she has a place in our country. And, I think when you look at the letters that I get, a lot of people are worried that maybe they wouldn't have a place in Donald Trump's America. They write me -- one woman wrote me about her son Felix, he adopted him from Ethiopia when he was a toddler. He is ten years old now. This is the only country he has ever known. And he listens to Donald on TV and he said to his mother one day, will he send me back to Ethiopia if he gets elected? You know, children listen to what is being said, to go back to the very, very first question. And there is a lot of fear; in fact, teachers and parents are calling it the Trump effect. Bullying is up, a lot of people are feeling, you know, uneasy, a lot of kids are expressing their concerns.

So first and foremost, I will do everything I can to reach out to everybody. Democrats, Republicans, Independents, people across our country. If you don't vote for me, I still want to be your president. I want to be the best president I can be for every American.

Well, within hours I said that I was sorry about the way I talked about that because my argument is not with his supporters, it’s with him. And the hateful and the divisive campaign that he has run. And the inciting of violence at his rallies. And the very brutal kinds of comments about, not just women, but all Americans. All kinds of Americans. And what he has said about African Americans and Latinos, about Muslims, about POWs, about immigrants, about people with disabilities, he’s never apologized for. And so I do think that a lot of the tone and tenor that he’s said - I’m proud of the campaign that Bernie Sanders and I ran. We ran a campaign on issues, not insults. And he is supporting me 100 percent, because we talked about what we wanted to do. We might’ve had some differences and we had a lot of debates, but we believed that we can come to better. I was proud of that.

No.

Well, it’s not only my opinion, it’s the opinion of many others, national security experts, Republicans, former Republican members of Congress. But it’s in part because those of us who have had the great privilege of seeing this job up close, and know how difficult it is, and it’s not just because I watched my husband take a 300 billion dollar deficit and turn it into a 200 billion surplus and 23 million new jobs were created and incomes went up for everybody. Everybody. African American incomes went up 33 percent.

And it’s not just because I worked with George W. Bush after 9/11. And I was very proud that when I told him what the city needed, what we need to recover, he said you’ve got it, and he never wavered. He stuck with me. And I have worked, and I admire President Obama. He inherited the worst financial crisis since the Great Depression.

That was a terrible time for our country.

9 million people lost their jobs. 5 million homes were lost and 13 trillion dollars in family wealth was wiped out. We are back on the right track. He would send us back into recession with his tax plans.

Thank you. Well, you’re right, this is one of the most important issues in this election. I want to appoint Supreme Court justices who understand the way the world really works, who have real-life experience, who have not just been in a big law firm and maybe clerked for a judge then gotten on the bench, but you know, maybe they tried some more cases, they actually understand what people are up against.

Because I think the current court has gone in the wrong direction. And so I would want to see the Supreme Court reverse Citizens United. And get dark, unaccountable money out of our politics. Donald doesn’t agree with that. I would like the Supreme Court to understand that voting rights are still a big problem in many parts of our country. That we don’t always do everything we can to make it possible for people of color and older people and young people to be able to exercise their franchise. I want a Supreme Court that will stick with Roe v. Wade and a woman’s right to choose, and I want a Supreme Court that will stick with marriage equality.

Now Donald has put forth the names of some people that he would consider, and among the ones that he has suggested are people who would reverse Roe v. Wade and reverse marriage equality. I think that would be a terrible mistake and would take us backwards. I want a Supreme Court that doesn’t always side with corporate interests. I want a Supreme Court that understands because you’re wealthy and can give more money to something, doesn’t mean you have any more rights or should have more rights than anyone else. So I have very clear views about what I want to see to kind of change the balance on the Supreme Court.

And I regret deeply that the Senate hasn’t done its job. And they have not permitted a vote on the person that President Obama- a highly qualified person - they’ve not given him a vote to be able to have the full complement of nine Supreme Court justices.

I think that was a dereliction of duty. I hope that they will see their way to doing it, but if I am so fortunate enough as to be president I will immediately move to make sure that we fill that -

But the question was about the Supreme Court and I just want to quickly say -

I respect the Second Amendment, but I believe there should be comprehensive background checks. And we should close the gun show loophole, and close the online loophole. And we have to try to save as many lives as we possibly can.  

Well, that was very interesting. First of all, China is illegally dumping steel in the United States, and Donald Trump is buying it to build his buildings. Putting steel workers and American steel plants out of business. That’s something that I fought against as a senator and I would have a trade prosecutor to make sure we don’t get taken advantage of by China on steel or anything else.

You know because it sounds like you’re in the business or you’re aware of people in the business. You know that we are now, for the first time ever, energy independent. We are not dependent upon the Middle East. But the Middle East still controls a lot of the prices. So the price of oil has been way down and that has had a damaging effect on a lot of the oil companies, right?

We are, however, producing a lot of natural gas which serves as a bridge to more renewable fuels. And I think that’s an important transition.

We’ve got to remain energy independent. It gives us much more power and freedom than to be worried about what goes on in the Middle East. We have enough worries over there without having to worrying about that.

So I have a comprehensive energy policy but it really does include fighting climate change because I think that is a serious problem. And I support moving to more clean and renewable energy as quickly as we can. Because I think we can be the 21st century clean energy superpower and create millions of new jobs and businesses. But I also want to be sure we don’t leave people behind. That’s why I’m the only candidate, from the very beginning of this campaign, who had a plan to help us revitalize coal country. Because those coal miners and their fathers and their grandfathers, they dug that coal out, a lot of them lost their lives, they were injured, but they turned the lights on and powered our factories. I don’t want to walk away from them. So we’ve got to do something for them.

But the price of coal is down worldwide. So we have to look at this comprehensively and that’s exactly what I have proposed. I hope you will go to HillaryClinton.com.

Well, I certainly will because I think that is a very fair and important question. Look, I respect his children. His children are incredibly able and devoted, and I think that says a lot about Donald. I don’t agree with nearly anything else he says or does. But I do respect that and I think that is something that as a mother and a grandmother is very important to me.

So, I believe that this election has become in part so conflict-oriented, so intense. Because there’s a lot at stake. This is not an ordinary time, and this is not an ordinary election. We are going to be choosing a president who will set policy not just for four or eight years, but because of some of the important decisions we have to make here at home and in the world, from the Supreme Court to energy, and so much else, and so there is a lot at stake. It’s one of the most consequential elections that we’ve had. And that’s why I’ve tried to put forth specific policies and plans, trying to get it off the personal and get it on to what I want to do as president. And that’s why I hope people will check on that for themselves, so they can see that yes, I’ve spent thirty years, actually maybe a little more, working to help kids and families, and I want to take that experience to the White House and do that every single day.

---

Thank you very much, Chris. And thank you UNLV for hosting us. You know, at the goings on about the Supreme Court, it really raises the central issue in this election. Namely, what kind of country are we going to be? What kind of opportunities will we provide for our citizens? What kind of rights will Americans have? And I feel strongly that the Supreme Court needs to stand on the side of the American people, not on the side of the powerful corporations and the wealthy. For me, that means that we need a Supreme Court that will stand up on behalf of of women's rights, on behalf of the rights of the LGBT community, that will stand up and say no to Citizens United, a decision that has undermined the election system in our country because of the way it permits dark, unaccountable money to come into our electoral system.

I have major disagreements with my opponent about these issues and others that will be before the Supreme Court. But I feel that at this point in our country's history, it is important that we not reverse marriage equality, that we not reverse Roe v. Wade, that we stand up against Citizens United -- we stand up for the rights of people in the workplace. That we stand up and basically say -- the Supreme Court should represent all of us. That's how I see the court. And the kind of people that I would be looking to nominate to the court would be in the great tradition of standing up to the powerful, standing on behalf of our rights as Americans. And I look forward to having the opportunity. I would hope that the Senate would do its job and confirm the nominee that President Obama has sent to them. That's the way the Constitution fundamentally should operate. The president nominates, and then the Senate advises and consents or not.

But they go forward with the process.

Well, I was upset because unfortunately dozens of toddlers injure themselves, even kill people, with guns because, unfortunately, not everyone who has loaded guns in their homes takes appropriate precautions. 

But there's no doubt that I respect the Second Amendment, that I also believe there is individual right to bear arms. That is not in conflict with sensible commonsense regulation and, you know, look, I understand that Donald's been strongly supported by the NRA; the gun lobby is on his side. They’re running millions of dollars of ads against me and I regret that, because what I would like to see is for people to come together and say, of course we're going to protect and defend the Second Amendment. But we're going to do it in a way that tries to save some of these thirty three thousand lives that we lose every year.

I strongly support Roe v. Wade which guarantees a constitutional right to a woman to make the most intimate, most difficult in many cases, decisions about her health care that one can imagine. And in this case is not only about Roe v. Wade. It is about what's happening right now in America. So many states are putting very stringent regulations on women that block them from exercising that choice to the extent that they are defunding Planned Parenthood, which of course, provides all kinds of cancer screenings and other benefits for women in our country. 

Donald has said he is in favor of defunding Planned Parenthood. He even supported shutting the government down to defund Planned Parenthood. I will defend Planned Parenthood. I will defend Roe v. Wade and I will defend women's rights to make their own healthcare decisions. We have come too far to have that turn back now and indeed he said women should be punished; that there should be some form of punishment for women who obtain abortions. And I could just not be more opposed to that kind of thinking.

Because Roe v. Wade very clearly sets out that there can be regulations on abortion so long as the life and health of the mother are taken into account. And when I voted as a senator, I did not think that that was the case. The kinds of cases that fall at the end of pregnancy are often the most heartbreaking, painful decisions for families to make. I have met with women who, toward the end of their pregnancy, get the worst news one could get that their health is in jeopardy if they continue to carry to term or that something terrible has happened or just been discovered about the pregnancy. I do not think the United States government should be stepping in and making those most personal of decisions. So you can regulate if you are doing so with the life and health of the mother taken into account.

As he was talking I was thinking about it young girl he met here in Las Vegas, Carla, who was very worried that her parents might he be deported because she was born in this country but they were not. They work hard, they do everything they can to get give her a good life. And you're right. I don't want to rip families apart. I don't want to be sending parents away from children. I don't want to see the deportation force that Donald has talked about in action in our country. We have eleven million undocumented people. They have four million American citizen children. Fifteen million people. He said as recently as a few weeks ago in Phoenix that every undocumented person will be subject to deportation. 

Now here's what that means -- it needs you would have to have a massive law enforcement presence where law enforcement officers would be going school to school, home to home, business to business rounding up people who are undocumented and we would then have to put them on trains, on buses to get them out of our country.

I think that is an idea that is not in keeping with who we are as a nation. I think it's an idea that would rip our country apart. I have been for border security for years. I voted for border security in the United States Senate and my comprehensive immigration reform plan of course include border security. But I want to put our resources where I think they're most needed. Getting rid of any violent person, anybody who should be deported, we should deport them. When it comes to the wall that Donald talks about building, he went to Mexico, he had a meeting with Mexican President - didn't even raise it, he choked, and then he got into a Twitter war because the Mexican president said we’re not paying for that wall. So I think we are both a nation of immigrants and we are a nation of laws and that we can act accordingly and that's why I am introducing comprehensive immigration reform within the first hundred days with a path to citizenship.

I voted for border security and there are some limited places where that was appropriate there also is necessarily going to be a technology and how best to deploy that.

But it is clear when you look at what Donald has been proposing he started his campaign bashing immigrants, calling Mexican immigrants rapists and criminals and drug dealers, that he has a very different view about what we should do to deal with immigrants. Now what I am also arguing is that bringing undocumented immigrants out from the shadows, putting them into the formal economy will be good because employers can’t exploit them and undercut Americans wages and Donald knows a lot about this. He's undocumented labor to build the Trump Tower. He underpaid undocumented workers and when they complained, he basically said what a lot of employers do - you complain I’ll get you deported.     

I want to get everybody out of the shadows get the economy working and not let employers like Donald exploit undocumented workers, which hurts them but also hurts American workers.

We will not have open borders. That is a rank mischaracterization. We will have secure borders but we will also have reform and this used to be a bipartisan issue. Ronald Reagan was the last president to sign immigration reform and George W. Bush supported it as well.

Well, if you went on to read the rest of the sentence, I was talking about energy.

You know, we trade more energy with our neighbors then we trade with rest of the world combined and I do want us to have an electric grid, an energy system that crosses borders, I think I would be a great benefit to us. But you are very clearly quoting from Wikileaks and what is important about that is that the Russian government has engaged in espionage against Americans. They have hacked American websites, American accounts of private people, of institutions, then they have given that information to WikiLeaks for the purpose of putting it on the Internet. This has come from the highest levels of the Russian government clearly from Putin himself.

In an effort, as seventeen of our intelligence agencies have confirmed, to influence our election. I actually think the most important question of this evening, Chris, is finally, will Donald Trump admit and condemn that the Russians are doing this and make it clear that he will not have the help of Putin in this election, that he rejects Russian espionage against Americans, which he actually encouraged in the past. Those are the questions we need answered. We had never had anything like this happen in any of our elections before.

Well, that’s because he'd rather have a puppet as president than the United States and it's pretty clear.

It's pretty clear that you won't admit the Russians have engaged in cyber attacks against the United States of America, that you encouraged espionage against our people, that you are willing to spout the Putin line, sign up for his wish list, breakup NATO, do whatever he wants to do and that you continue to get help from him because he has a very clear favorite in this race. So, I think that this is such an unprecedented situation. We have never had a foreign government trying to interfere in our election. We have seventeen intelligence agencies, civilian and military, who have all concluded that these espionage attacks, these cyber attacks, come from the highest levels of the Kremlin and they are designed to influence our election. I find that deeply disturbing and I think it --

I am quoting seventeen intelligence agencies. Do you doubt seventeen military and civilian agencies, as well? He'd rather believe Vladimir Putin than the military and civilian intelligence professionals who are sworn to protect us. I find that just absolutely striking.

I find it -- ironic that he is raising nuclear weapons. This is a person who has been very cavalier, even casual about the use of nuclear weapons. He’s advocated more countries getting them

.. Japan, Korea, even Saudi Arabia. He said, well if we had them why don't we use them? Which I think is terrifying. But here's the deal: the bottom line on nuclear weapons is that when the president gives the order, it must be followed. There is about four minutes between the order being given and the people responsible for launching nuclear weapons to do so. And that is why ten people who have had that awesome responsibility have come out in an unprecedented way said they would not trust Donald Trump with the nuclear codes or to have his finger on the nuclear button.

Well, I'm just quoting you, when -- you were asked about a potential nuclear competition in Asia you said go ahead and enjoy yourselves folks.

That kind of, that kind of language -- the United States have kept the peace through our alliances. Donald wants to tear up our alliances. I think it makes the world safer and frankly it makes the United States safer. I would work with our allies in Asia, in Europe, in the Middle East and elsewhere. That the only way we're going to keep the peace.

I think when the middle class thrives, North America thrives and so my plan is based on growing the economy, giving middle-class families many more opportunities. I want us to have the biggest jobs program since World War II, jobs in infrastructure and advanced manufacturing. I think we can compete with high wage countries and I believe we should. New jobs and clean energy, not only to fight climate change, which is a serious problem, but to create new opportunities and new businesses. I want us to do more to help small business. That's where two thirds of the new jobs are going to come from.

I want us to raise the national minimum wage because people who live in poverty, who work full-time, should not still be in poverty and I sure do want to make sure women get equal pay for the work we do.

I feel strongly that we have to have an education system that starts with preschool and goes through college. That's why I want more technical education in high schools and in community colleges, real apprenticeships to prepare young people for the jobs of the future. I want to make college debt-free and for families making less than a hundred twenty five thousand dollars. You will not get a tuition bill from a public college or a university if the plan that I worked on with Bernie Sanders is enacted. 

And we're going to work hard to make sure that it is, because we are going to go where the money is. Most of the gains in the last year since the great recession have gone to the very top. So we are going to have the wealthy pay their fair share. We are going to have corporations make a contribution greater than they are now to our country. That is a plan that has been analyzed by independent experts that said it could produce ten million new jobs. By contrast, Donald's plan has been analyzed to conclude it might lose three and half million jobs. 

Why? Because his whole plan is to cut taxes to cut give the biggest tax breaks ever to the wealthy and the corporations. Adding twenty trillion dollars to our debt and causing the kind of dislocation that we have seen before, because it truly will be trickle-down economics on steroids. So the plan I have will actually produce greater opportunities; the plan he has will cost us jobs and possibly lead to another great recession.

Well, let me translate that if I can Chris -

Because fact is he is going to advocate for the largest tax cuts we've ever seen, times more than the tax cuts under the Bush administration. 

I have said repeatedly throughout this campaign I will not raise taxes on anyone making two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less. I also will not add a penny to the debt. I have costed out what I'm going to do. He will, through his massive tax cuts, add twenty trillion dollars to the debt. Well, he mentioned the debt. We know how to get control of the debt. When my husband was president, we went from a three hundred million dollars deficit to a two hundred billion dollars surplus, and we're actually on the path to eliminating the national debt. When President Obama came to office, he inherited the worst economic disaster since the Great Depression. He has cut the deficit by two thirds. So, yes, one of the ways you go after the debt, one of the ways you create jobs is by investing in people. So I do have investments -- investments in new jobs, investments in education, skill training and the opportunities for people to get ahead and stay ahead. That's the kind of approach that will work. Adding taxes on the wealthy, we’ve tried that -- it has not worked the way that it has been promised.

See a breakdown of how Trump and Clinton’s plans would affect after-tax incomes her.

Well, it’s a combination, Chris. And let me say that when you inherit the level of economic catastrophe that President Obama inherited, it was a real touch and go situation. I was in the Senate before I became Secretary of State.

I've never seen people as physically distraught as the Bush administration team was because of what was happening to the economy. I personally believe that the steps that President Obama took saved the economy. He doesn't get the credit he deserves for taking some very hard positions. But it was a terrible recession. So now, we dug ourselves out of it. We’re standing, but we’re not yet running. So what I am proposing is that we invest the middle out and the ground up, not the top down. That is not going to work. That’s why what I have put forward does not at a penny to the debt, but it is the kind of approach that will enable more people to take those new jobs, higher-paying jobs. We’re beginning to see some increase in incomes. 

And we certainly have had a long string of increase in jobs. We got to do more to get the whole economy moving. And that's what I believe I will be able to do.

First, let me say number one, when I saw the final agreement for TPP, I said I was against it. It didn’t meet my test. I’ve had the same test -- does it create jobs, raise incomes and further our national security? I’m against it now, I’ll be against it after the election, I’ll be against it when I’m president. Only one of us on the stage was actually shipped jobs to Mexico, because that’s Donald. He’s shipped jobs to twelve countries, including Mexico. But he mentioned China. One of the biggest problems that we have China is the illegal dumping of steel and aluminum into our markets. 

I have fought against that as a senator. I’ve stood up against it as Secretary of State. Donald has bought Chinese steel and aluminum. In fact, the Trump Hotel right here in Las Vegas was made with Chinese steel. So he goes around with crocodile tears about how terrible it is, but he has given jobs to Chinese steelworkers, not American Steelworkers.

That's the kind of approach that is just not going to work. We’re going to pull the country together and have trade agreement shall be in force. That’s why I'm going to have a trade prosecutor for the first time in history. And were going to enforce those agreements, were going to look to businesses for buying the help of the buy American products.

No, I voted -

Well, first of all, what you just said about the State Department is not only untrue, it has been debunked numerous times. But I think it's really an important issue he raised, the thirty years of experience. So let me just talk briefly about that. You know, back in the 1970s, I worked for the Children's Defense fund and I was taking on discrimination against African-American kids in schools. He was getting sued by the Justice Department for racial discrimination in his apartment buildings.  

In the 1980s, I was working to reform the schools in Arkansas. He was borrowing fourteen million dollars from his father to start his businesses. In the 1990s, I went to Beijing. And I said women's rights are human rights. He insulted a former Miss Universe, Alicia Machado -- called her an eating machine. And on the day when I was in the situation room, monitoring the raid that brought Osama bin Laden to justice, he was hosting the Celebrity Apprentice. So I am happy to compare my thirty years experience, what I've done for this country, trying to help in every way I could, especially kids and families, get ahead and stay ahead, with your thirty years. And I will let the American people make that decision.

Well, at the last debate we heard Donald talking about what he did to women. And after that, a number of women have come forward saying that's exactly what he did to them. Now what was his response? Well, he held a number of big rallies where he said that he could not possibly have done those things to those women because they were not attractive enough for them to be assaulted.

In fact he went on to say.

He went on to say, “Look at her. I don't think so.” About another woman, he said, that wouldn’t be my first choice. He attacked the woman reporter writing the story, called her disgusting as he has called a number of women during this campaign. Donald thinks belittling women makes him bigger. He goes after their dignity, their self-worth, and I don't think there is a woman anywhere doesn't know what that feels like. So we now know what Donald thinks and what he says and how he acts toward women. That’s who Donald is. I think it's really up to all of us to demonstrate who we are and who our country is, and to stand up and be very clear about what we expect from our next president, how we want to bring our country together, where we don't want to have the kind of pitting of people one against the other where instead we celebrate our diversity, we lift people up, and we make our country even greater. America is great because America is good. And it really is up to all of us to make that true now and in the future and particularly for our children and our grandchildren.

Every time Donald is pushed on something which is obviously uncomfortable like with these women are saying, he immediately goes to denying responsibility and it's not just about women. He never apologizes or says he’s sorry for anything. So we know what he has said and what he's done to women. But he also went after a disabled reporter, mocked and mimicked him on national television. He went after Mr. and Mrs. Khan, the parents of a young man who died serving our country, a Gold Star family, because of their religion. He went after John McCain, a prisoner of war, said he prefers people who aren't captured. He went after a federal judge, born in Indiana, but who Donald said couldn't be trusted to try the fraud and racketeering case against Trump University because his parents were Mexican.

So it's not one thing. This is a pattern, a pattern of divisiveness of a very dark and in many ways dangerous vision of our country where he incites violence, where he applauds people who are pushing and pulling and punching at his rallies. That is not who America is and I hope that as we move in the last weeks of this campaign, more and more people will understand what's at stake in this election. It really does come down to a kind of country we are going to have.

Well, everything I did as Secretary of State was in furtherance of our country's interests and our values. The State Department has said that, I think that it's been proven. But I am happy -- in fact, I am thrilled to talk about the Clinton Foundation because it is a world renowned charity and I am so proud of the work that it does. You know, I could talk for the rest of the debate -- I know I don't have the time to do that, but just briefly: the Clinton Foundation made a possible for eleven million people around the world with HIV-AIDS to afford treatment, and that's about half of all the people the world who are getting treatment. In partnership with the American Health Association, we have made environments and schools healthier -

Well, it is an open discussion.

There is a lot of evidence about the very good work the high-ranking.

Very quickly, we at the Clinton Foundation spend ninety percent -- ninety percent -- of all the money that is donated on behalf of programs of people around the world and in our own country. I’m very proud of that. We have the highest rating from the watchdogs that follow foundations and I'd be happy to compare what we do with the Trump Foundation, which took money from other people and bought a six foot portrait of Donald. I mean, who does that? It just was astonishing.

But when it comes to Haiti -- Haiti is the poorest country in our hemisphere, the earthquake and hurricane, has devastated Haiti. Bill and I have been involved in trying to help Haiti for many years. The Clinton Foundation raised thirty million dollars to help Haiti after the catastrophic earthquake and all of the terrible problems the people there had. We’ve done things to help small businesses, agriculture and so much else. And we’re going to keep working to help Haiti because it's an important part of the American experience.

Of course there's no way we can know whether any of that's true because he hasn’t released his tax returns. He is the first candidate ever to run for president in the last forty plus years who has not released his tax returns, so everything he says about charity or anything else, we can't prove it. You can look at our tax returns. We've got them all out there. But what is really troubling is that we learned, in the last debate, he has not paid a penny in federal income tax. And we were talking about immigrants a few minutes ago, Chris. You know, half of all immigrants, undocumented immigrants in our country, actually pay federal income tax. So we have undocumented immigrants in America who are paying more federal income tax than a billionaire. I find that just astonishing.

Made with Chinese steel.

Chris, let me respond to that because that is horrifying. You know, every time Donald thinks things are not going in his direction, he claims whatever it is is rigged against him. The FBI conducted a year-long investigation into my e-mails. They concluded there was no case. He said that the FBI was rigged. He lost the Iowa caucus, he lost the Wisconsin primary. He said the Republican primary was rigged against him. Then Trump University gets sued for fraud and racketeering. He claims the court system and the federal judge is rigged against him. There was even a time when he didn't get an Emmy for his TV program three years in a row and he started tweeting that the Emmys were rigged.

This is a mindset; this is how Donald thinks. And it’s funny but it’s also really troubling. This is not the way our democracy works. We've been around for two hundred and forty years. We have had free and fair elections. We have accepted the outcomes when we may not have liked them. And that is what must be expected of anyone standing on the debate stage during a general election. President Obama said the other day when you are whining before the game isn’t even finished --

-- it just shows you're not up to doing the job. And let's be clear about what he is saying and what that means. He is denigrating. He is talking down our democracy. And I for one am appalled that someone the nominee of one of our two major parties would take that kind of position.

Well, I am encouraged that there is an effort led by the Iraqi army, supported by Kurdish forces and also given the help and advice from the number of special forces and other Americans on the ground, but I will not support putting American soldiers into Iraq as an occupying force. I don't think that is in our interests and I don't think that would be smart to do. In fact, Chris, I think that would be a big red flag waving for ISIS it to reconstitute itself. The goal here is to take back Mosul. It is going be a hard fight. I've got no illusions about that. And then continue to press into Syria to begin to take back and move on Raqqa, which is the ISIS headquarters.

I am hopeful that the hard work that American military advisors have done will pay off and that we will see a really successful military operation. But we know we've got lots of work to do. Syria will remain a hotbed of terrorism as long as the civil war aided and abetted by the Iranians and Russians continue. So I have said, look, we need to keep our eye on ISIS. That is why I want to have an intelligence surge that protects us here at home. Why we have to go after them from the air, on the ground, online. We have to make sure here at home we don't let terrorists buy weapons -- if you are too dangerous to fly, you are too dangerous to buy a gun. And I am going to continue to push for a no-fly zone and safe havens within Syria.

Not only to help protect the Syrians and prevent the constant outflow of refugees, but to frankly gain some leverage on both the Syrian government and the Russians so that perhaps we can have the kind of serious negotiation necessary to bring the conflict to an end and go forward on a political track.

Well, you know, once again Donald is implying that he didn’t support the invasion of Iraq. I said it was a mistake, I said that years ago. He has consistently denied what is a very clear fact,

that before the invasion he supported it. You know, I just want everybody to go Google it. Google ‘Donald Trump Iraq’ and you will see the dozens of sources which verify that he was for the invasion of Iraq.

And you can actually hear the audio of him saying that. Now why does that matter? Well, it matters because he has not told the truth about that position. I guess he believes that makes it look him look better now to contrast with me because I did vote for it. But what is really important here is to understand all the interplay. Mosul is a Sunni city. Mosul is on the border of Syria and, yes, we do have to go after Baghdadi and just like we went after bin Laden, while you were doing Celebrity Apprentice, and we brought him to justice. We need to go after the leadership but we need to get rid of them, get rid of their fighters, their estimated several thousand fighters in Mosul -- they’ve been digging underground, they’ve been prepared to defend. It's going to be tough fighting, but I think we can take back Mosul and then we can move on into Syria and take back Raqqa. This is what we have to do. I'm just amazed that he seems to think that the Iraqi government and our allies and everybody else launched the attack on Mosul to help me in this election. But that’s how Donald thinks. He's looking for some conspiracy. He has all of these conspiracies.

He’s unfit and he proves it every time he talks.

Well, you should ask Bernie Sanders who he is supporting for president. And he has said, as he has campaigned for me around the around the country: you are the most dangerous person to run for president in the modern history of America. I think he's right.

Well, Chris, first of all, I think a no-fly zone could save lives and could hasten the end of the conflict. I am well aware of the really legitimate concerns that you have expressed from both the President and the general. This would not be done just on the first day. This would take a lot of negotiation. It would also take making it clear to the Russians and the Syrians that our purpose here was to provide safe zones on the ground

We've had millions of people leave Syria. And those millions of people inside Syria who have been dislocated. So I think we could strike a deal and make it very clear to the Russians and the Syrians that this was something that we believe was in the best interest of the people on the ground in Syria. It would help us with our fight against ISIS. But I want to respond to what Donald said about refugees. He’s made these claims repeatedly. I am not going to let anyone into this country who is not vetted, Who we do not have confidence in. But I am not going to slam the door on women and children. That picture of that little four-year-old boy in Aleppo with the blood coming down his face while he sat in an ambulance is haunting. And so we are going to do very careful, thorough vetting. That does not solve our internal challenges with ISIS and our need to stop radicalization, to work with American Muslim communities who are on the frontlines to identify and prevent attacks. The killer of the dozens of people at the nightclub in Orlando, the Pulse nightclub, was born in Queens, same place Donald was born.

So let's be clear about what the threat is and how we are best going to be able to meet it. And yes, some of that threat emanates from over in Syria and Iraq and we’ve got to keep fighting. And I will defeat ISIS and some of it is we have to up our game and be much smarter here at home.

Well, first, when I hear Donald talk like that and know that his slogan is Make America Great Again, I wonder when he thought America was great. And before he rushed in and says, before you and President Obama were there, I think it's important to recognize that he has been criticizing our government for decades. You know, back in 1987, he took out a one hundred thousand dollar ad in the New York Times during the time when President Reagan was president and basically said exactly what he just said now -- that we were the laughing stock of the world. He was criticizing President Reagan. This is the way Donald thinks about himself, puts himself into, you know, the middle and says, you know, I alone can fix it, as he said on the convention stage. But if you look at the debt, which is the issue you asked about, Chris, I pay for everything I'm proposing. I do not add a penny to the national debt. 

I take that very seriously because I do think it's one of the issues we've got to come to grips with. So when I talk about how we're going to pay for education, how we’re going to invest in infrastructure, how we're going to get the cost of prescription drugs down, a lot of the other issues that people talk to me about all the time, I've made it very clear. We are going where the money is. We are going to ask the wealthy and corporations to pay their fair share. And there is no evidence whatsoever that that will slow down or diminish our growth. In fact, I think just the opposite. We’ll have what economists call middle-out growth. We've got to get back to rebuilding the middle class, the families of America. That's where growth will come from. That's why I want to invest in you. I want to invest in your family. And I think that's the smartest way to grow the economy, to make the economy fairer. And we just have a big disagreement about this. It may be because of our experiences, you know, he started off with his dad as a millionaire. I started off with my dad as a small businessman. and, I think it's, you know,

it's a difference that affects how we see the world and what we want to do the economy.

Well, Chris, I am on record as saying that we need to put more money into the Social Security trust fund.

That’s part of my commitment to raise taxes on the wealthy. My social security payroll contribution will go up, as will Donald’s, assuming he can't figure out how to get out of it. But what we want to do is to replenish the social security trust fund--

-- by making sure that we have sufficient resources. And that will come from either raising the cap and or finding other ways to get more money into it. I will not cut benefits. I want to enhance benefits for low-income workers. And for women who have been disadvantaged by the current Social Security system. But what Donald is proposing with these massive tax cuts will result in a twenty trillion dollar additional national debt. That will have dire consequences for Social Security and Medicare. And I’ll say something about the Affordable Care Act, which he wants to repeal: the Affordable Care Act extended the solvency of the Medicare trust fund.

So if he repeals it, our Medicare problem gets worse. What we need to do is go after the long-term health care drivers. We've got to get cost down, increase value, emphasize wellness. I have a plan for doing that. And I think that we will be able to get entitlement spending under control with more resources and smarter decisions.

Well, I would like to say to everyone watching tonight that I am reaching out to all Americans, Democrats, Republicans and Independents, because we need everybody to help make our country what it should be -- to grow the economy, to make it fairer, to make it work for everyone. We need your talents, your skills, your commitment, your energy, your ambition. You know, I've been privileged to see the presidency up close. And I know the awesome responsibility of protecting our country and the incredible opportunity of working to try to make life better for all of you. I have made the cause of children and families really my life's work. That's what my mission will be in my presidency. I will stand up for families against powerful interests, against corporations. I will do everything that I can to make sure that you have good jobs with rising incomes, that your kids have good educations from preschool through college. I hope you will give me a chance to serve as your president.

